Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
CHAPTER 194B Cabinet for Families and Children [Repealed]

194B.005.
Definitions for chapter. [Repealed.]

194B.010.
Cabinet for Families and Children — Functions. [Repealed.]

194B.025.
Power and authority of secretary. [Repealed.]

194B.030.
Major organizational units of the cabinet. [Repealed.]

194B.040.
Internal organization of offices and departments — Secretary’s powers to create positions — Election of coverage under unemployment insurance. [Repealed.]

194B.050.
Execution of policies, plans, and programs — Administrative regulations — Fees. [Repealed.]

194B.060.
Confidentiality of records and reports. [Repealed.]

194B.070.
Utilizing community resources for delivery of services. [Repealed.]

194B.080.
Cost-allocation plan. [Repealed.]

194B.090.
Council for Families and Children. [Repealed.]

194B.100.
Legislative finding and declaration. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

194B.102.
Statewide Strategic Planning Committee for Children in Placement — Membership — Strategic plan — Facilities and services plan — Review — Information systems — Annual report. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

194B.110.
Kentucky Commission on Human Services Collaboration. [Repealed.]

194B.130.
Limitation on administrative processes. [Repealed.]

194B.140.
Special subcommittees of the Council for Families and Children. [Repealed.]

194B.150.
State officials as voting members of citizens’ councils. [Repealed.]

194B.160.
Alternates or representatives for boards, commissions, and similar bodies. [Repealed.]

194B.170.
Secretary’s authority to create special task forces, advisory committees, and other citizens’ panels. [Repealed.]

194B.180.
Administrative regulations and decisions of various bodies transferred to Institute for Aging. [Repealed.]

194B.190.
Gifts and grants to the Council for Families and Children. [Repealed.]

194B.200.
Compensation and expenses of members of the Council for Families and Children — Members of citizens’ councils not public officers. [Repealed.]

194B.360.
Annual report on committed children — Contents. [Repealed and reenacted.]

194B.370.
Professional development for staff on child development and abuse. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

194B.500.
Definitions for KRS 194B.505. [Repealed.]

194B.505.
Prohibited activities — Commencement of proceedings for enforcement. [Repealed.]

194B.510.
Defense in prosecution. [Repealed.]

194B.515.
Access to criminal records by cabinet’s agents. [Repealed.]

194B.530.
Training and continuing education courses for staff of Department for Community Based Services. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

194B.535.
Training requirements for staff of agencies providing shelter services for victims. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

194B.550.
Definitions for KRS 194B.550 to 194B.559. [Repealed.]

194B.552.
Office on Alzheimer’s Disease and Related Disorders — Director — Report — Purposes and duties. [Repealed.]

194B.555.
Alzheimer’s Disease and Related Disorders Council — Members — Duties. [Repealed.]

194B.559.
Authority to promulgate administrative regulations. [Repealed.]

194B.570.
Kentucky Commission on Community Volunteerism and Service. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

194B.572.
Commission membership — Term limits. [Repealed and reenacted.]

194B.575.
Purpose of commission. [Repealed and reenacted.]

194B.578.
Duties of commission — Authority for administrative regulations. [Repealed and reenacted.]

194B.990.
Penalties. [Repealed.]